Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 7
DISCONNECTION BY COURT DECREE - STATUTORY TOWNS

31-12-701. Part 7 relates to towns only.

This part 7 shall relate to towns only and shall not be construed to affect the disconnection of area from cities.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1102, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-501 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-702. Petition court to disconnect from town.

When a tract or two or more contiguous tracts of agricultural or farm land aggregating twenty or more acres in area are embraced within the corporate limits of any town, the outer boundary of which acreage is adjacent to or upon the border of said town, the owners of said tracts of land may petition the district court for the county in which such land is situated to have the same disconnected from said incorporated town. Intersecting highways or intervening railroads shall not render said tracts of land noncontiguous or nonadjacent.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1102, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-502 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-703. Petition - contents.

The petition shall contain the following:

An allegation that such tracts of land contain in the aggregate an area of twenty or more acres of agricultural or farm land upon or adjacent to the border of said town;

An allegation that the petitioners are the owners thereof;

The description of the land;

An allegation that no part of such area has been platted into lots or blocks as a part of or an addition to said town or, if so platted, that such plat has been vacated within a period of three years after the area was included within the boundaries of the town. The time limit provided in this paragraph (d) shall not apply to lands within towns that were incorporated prior to January 1, 1930.

An allegation that all taxes or assessments lawfully due and payable upon said land up to the time of the presentation of said petition are fully paid;

A representation that, for a period of six years after the effective date of disconnection, said tracts will not be subdivided into lots or plots of smaller area than is required during said period for lots within said town adjoining said tracts under the applicable ordinances or regulations of the town from which disconnection is sought and will not be used during said period for industrial or commercial use if during said period the applicable ordinances of the town from which disconnection is sought prohibits such use in the area within said town adjoining such tracts.

Any decree of disconnection entered pursuant to this part 7 shall restrict the use of the land in the manner set forth in paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of this section, but such restrictions shall not continue to apply to any land which, within six years after the effective date of the disconnection, is annexed back into the town.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1103, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-503 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-704. Hearing - decree - proviso.

Upon the filing of such petition in the district court, the judge shall set a date for a hearing, not less than forty days nor more than sixty days thereafter. The clerk of the court shall serve a copy of the petition and a notice of the date and the time set for such hearing upon the mayor of the town. The same must be served at least thirty days prior to the hearing on such petition by the court. Upon the hearing and proof of the facts set forth in such petition, the court shall determine whether the tracts of land should be disconnected from the town, and the judge shall enter an order or decree accordingly. When a town has improved any of the highways passing through or adjoining said tracts of land by the construction and maintenance by the town of any special improvements along, under, or over the same for a period of more than two years prior to the presentation of the petition, the petitioners are not entitled to disconnect the land under the provisions of this part 7. Any disconnected land shall be made subject to the applicable county's zoning resolution and map and other land development regulations within ninety days after the effective date of the disconnection as described in section 31-12-501 (5).

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1103, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1133), ch. 99, p. 385, § 3, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-504 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-705. Land not exempt from prior taxes.

The land so disconnected shall not be exempt from the payment of any taxes lawfully assessed against it for the purpose of paying any indebtedness lawfully contracted by the governing body of said town while said land was within the limits thereof and which remains unpaid and for the payment of which said land could be lawfully taxed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1104, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-505 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-706. Land subject to tax for prior indebtedness.

When the governing body of such town levies a tax upon the property within such town for the purpose of paying such indebtedness or any part thereof and interest thereon, such governing body shall have the authority to levy a tax at the same rate and for the same purpose on the land so disconnected. The county treasurer shall pay over to such town all moneys collected by him on account of such tax, to be applied only to the payment of such indebtedness. In case the owner of any land so disconnected pays off and discharges a portion of such indebtedness equal in amount to the same proportion of the indebtedness which the valuation for assessment of his land bears to the entire valuation for assessment of all the property subject to taxation for the payment of such indebtedness, calculated according to the last assessment previous to such payment, said land shall be exempted from further taxation to pay such indebtedness. Upon such payment being made, the canceled bonds or other evidences of payment of such portion of said indebtedness shall be deposited with the treasurer of such town, and a certificate shall be given by him stating that such payment has been made.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1104, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-506 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-707. Decree recorded - proof.

Two copies of the order or decree of said district court disconnecting any land described in said petition from any town, certified by the clerk of said district court, shall be filed for record in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county in which such disconnected land is situated. The county clerk and recorder shall file the second certified copy with the division of local government in the department of local affairs, as provided by section 24-32-109, C.R.S. Such record or a copy of such order or decree, certified by the clerk of said district court, shall be proof of the disconnection of such land.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1104, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-507 as it existed prior to 1975.